Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 24.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8924
Enforcement of act.

The department, the Attorney General, or any county attorney may institute an action in the name of the state for an injunction or other process against any person to restrain or prevent any violation of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 24.